Tennessee, session 114, SB2442.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-84-513, is amended by deleting the
language "nor more than forty-five (45) days" and substituting "nor more than sixty (60) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2442
012623
- 1 -